Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4412
Insurance coverage; prohibitions.

A risk retention group may not offer insurance coverage prohibited by Chapter 44 or declared unlawful by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 12.